North Dakota, session 69, HB1308.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 54-12-33 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
54-12-33. Human trafficking commission.
1. The attorney general mayshall establish a human trafficking commission, comprised of
designees from state, local, and tribal agencies which have contact with victims or
perpetrators, nongovernmental organizations that represent or work with victims, and other
organizations and individuals, including victims, whose expertise would benefit the
commission. The attorney general may establish the commission by appointing an existing
statewide coalitionIn addition to the attorney general designees, the commission must include:
a. A legislator from the majority party, appointed by the chairman of the legislative
management;
b. A legislator from the minority party, appointed by the chairman of the legislative
management;
c. An individual from the department of health and human services child and family services
division, appointed by the commissioner of the department of health and human services;
d. An individual representing a rural school district, appointed by the superintendent of
public instruction;
e. An individual representing one of the state's largest ten school districts, appointed by the
superintendent of public instruction;
f. An individual representing tribal nations, appointed by the North Dakota united tribes
tribal chairman's association;
g. An individual from the North Dakota state's attorneys' association, appointed by the
executive director of the North Dakota state's attorneys' association; and
h. An individual from the governor's office, appointed by the governor.
2. The attorney general or the attorney general's designee shall serve as the presiding officer of
the commission.
3. The commission shall:
a. Collect and evaluate data on human trafficking in this state and submit an annual report
to the attorney general, governor, and legislative assembly;
b. Promote awareness and provide information to education personnel and the general
public about human trafficking, victim remedies and services, and trafficking prevention;

H. B. NO. 1308 - PAGE 2
c. Promote training on human trafficking prevention and victim services for state and local
employees and members of regulated occupations and professions who may have
recurring contact with victims or perpetrators;
d. Promote training on human trafficking investigation and prosecution and on missing and
murdered indigenous people with the North Dakota state's attorney's association, the
North Dakota peace officers standards and training board, and state and local law
enforcement agencies;
e. Present annually regarding human trafficking awareness and prevention at professional
development conferences directed toward teachers, administrators, and support staff
which are hosted by educational organizations in this state or by the department of public
instruction; and
f. Facilitate annual prevention and awareness education for students on human trafficking
and exploitation; and
g. Conduct other appropriate activities.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 54-12-33 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
54-12-33. Human trafficking commission.
1. The attorney general shall establish a human trafficking commission, comprised of designees
from state, local, and tribal agencies which have contact with victims or perpetrators,
nongovernmental organizations that represent or work with victims, and other organizations
and individuals, including victims, whose expertise would benefit the commission. In addition
to the attorney general designees, the commission must include:
a. A legislator from the majority party, appointed by the chairman of the legislative
management;
b. A legislator from the minority party, appointed by the chairman of the legislative
management;
c. An individual from the department of health and human services child and family services
division, appointed by the commissioner of the department of health and human services;
d. An individual representing a rural school district, appointed by the superintendent of
public instruction;
e. An individual representing one of the state's largest ten school districts, appointed by the
superintendent of public instruction;
f. An individual representing tribal nations, appointed by the North Dakota united tribes
tribal chairman's association;
g. An individual from the North Dakota state's attorneys' association, appointed by the
executive director of the North Dakota state's attorneys' association; and
h. An individual from the governor's office, appointed by the governor.
2. The attorney general or the attorney general's designee shall serve as the presiding officer of
the commission.
3. The commission shall:

H. B. NO. 1308 - PAGE 3
a. Collect and evaluate data on human trafficking in this state and submit an annual report
to the attorney general, governor, and legislative assembly;
b. Promote awareness and provide information to education personnel and the general
public about human trafficking, victim remedies and services, and trafficking prevention;
c. Promote training on human trafficking prevention and victim services for state and local
employees and members of regulated occupations and professions who may have
recurring contact with victims or perpetrators;
d. Promote training on human trafficking investigation and prosecution and on missing and
murdered indigenous people with the North Dakota state's attorney's association, the
North Dakota peace officers standards and training board, and state and local law
enforcement agencies;
e. Present annually regarding human trafficking awareness and prevention at professional
development conferences directed toward teachers, administrators, and support staff
which are hosted by educational organizations in this state or by the department of public
instruction;
f. Facilitate annual prevention and awareness education for students on human trafficking
and exploitation , in accordance with the new section to chapter 15.1 - 09, as created by
Senate Bill No . 2330, as approved by the sixty - ninth legislative assembly ; and
g. Conduct other appropriate activities.
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Section 54-12-33.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
54-12-33.1. Human trafficking prevention training - Exemptions - Immunity - Continuing
appropriation.
1. As used in this section:
a. "Human trafficking" means human trafficking as defined in chapter 12.1-41.
b. "Human trafficking commission" means the commission established under section
54-12-33.
c. "Lodging establishment" means any hotel, motel, resort, building, or structure that is used
to provide sleeping accommodations to transient guests.
d. "Proprietor" means the person in charge of a lodging establishment and includes an
owner, lessee, and manager.
e. "Regulated occupation or profession" includes a profession regulated by the education
standards and practices board, an occupation or profession regulated under title 43, and
an attorney licensed to practice law in this state.
2. Within ninety days of the effective date of this section, theThe human trafficking commission
shall establish an educational training program with a focus on the accurate and prompt
identification and reporting of, or response to, suspected human trafficking. To the extent
possible, the human trafficking commission shall allow the use of existing training modules
and materials. The training must include:
a. Human trafficking awareness;
b. How to recognize potential victims of human trafficking;

H. B. NO. 1308 - PAGE 4
c. How to identify activities commonly associated with human trafficking; and
d. Effective responses to human trafficking situations, including how to report suspected
human trafficking to law enforcement.
3. A proprietor may:
a. Provide each onsite employee with the training described in subsection 2.
b. In an employee roster or in each employee's personnel file, annually certify each
employee has received the training approved by the human trafficking commission.
c. Conduct an ongoing awareness campaign for employees which addresses the
information described in subsection 2.
4. A proprietor may post and maintain a poster approved and provided by the human trafficking
commission which contains the information described in subsection 2. The poster must
include the contact information for an organization that provides assistance and support
services to human trafficking victims. The poster may be visibly displayed at the lodging
establishment's check-in area, lobby, or transient guest services.
5. An entity that regulates an occupation or profession may accept the training described in
subsection 2 for continuing education credit .
6. A proprietor or employee of a lodging establishment or a member of a regulated occupation or
profession who acts in good faith is immune from liability in any civil action for reporting
suspected human trafficking activities but a member of a regulated occupation or profession
may be subject to disciplinary action for the reporting if the reporting violates an applicable
ethics regulation imposed by the member's regulated occupation or profession.
6.7. The human trafficking commission may seek, apply for, accept, and receive any donation, gift,
grant, or bequest offered or tendered from public or private sources for the purpose of
furthering the objectives of the human trafficking prevention training and incentivizing
proprietors and members of a regulated occupation or profession to participate in the human
trafficking prevention training. All moneys received or accepted under this subsection are
appropriated on a continuing basis to the human trafficking commission.
SECTION 4. CONTINGENT EFFECTIVE DATE. Section 2 of this Act becomes effective if the new
section to chapter 15.1-09 of the North Dakota Century Code, as created by Senate Bill No. 2330, is
approved by the sixty-ninth legislative assembly.

H. B. NO. 1308 - PAGE 5
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1308.
House Vote: Yeas 94 Nays 0 Absent 0
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 1 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State